Ohio, session 136, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) As used in this section, "child care staff member" does not include an employee of an approved child day camp or an administrator, authorized representative, or owner. (B) The Department of Children and Youth shall establish the Workforce Investment Now (WIN) for Child Care pilot program to provide publicly funded child care to child care staff members. Subject to available funds, the pilot program shall operate during fiscal years 2026 and 2027. (C) Under the program, when determining eligibility for publicly funded child care as described in section 5104.34 of the Revised Code, a county department of job and family services shall exclude all of a family's income from that determination if an applicant for publicly funded child care demonstrates to the county department that the child's caretaker parent is a child care staff member who works a minimum of twenty hours per week. Such an applicant shall otherwise meet the requirements of division (A)(2)(a) of section 5104.34 of the Revised Code. (D) Not later than six months after the conclusion of the pilot program, the Department shall complete a report on the information collected and findings from the pilot program. On completion, the Department shall submit the report to the Governor and to the General Assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 3. 1 2 3 4 5 A KID DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 830412 Child Care Grants $20,000,000 $0 D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $20,000,000 $0 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $20,000,000 $0 CHILD CARE GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 830412, Child Care Grants, shall be used for the Workforce Investment Now (WIN) for Child Care pilot program described in Section 1 of this act. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 830412, Child Care Grants, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act of the 136th General Assembly.